en: Bluetooth Transmitters
xx: Bluetooth Transmitters
cs: Vysílače Bluetooth
da: Bluetooth-sendere
de: Bluetooth-Sender
es: Transmisores Bluetooth
fr: Transmetteurs Bluetooth
it: Trasmettitori Bluetooth
ja: Bluetoothトランスミッター
nl: Bluetooth-toestellen
no: Bluetooth-sendere
pl: Transmitery Bluetooth
pt: Transmissores bluetooth
ru: Передатчики Bluetooth
sv: Bluetooth-sändare
tr: Bluetooth Vericiler

en: FM Transmitters
xx: FM Transmitters
cs: FM vysílače
da: FM-sendere
de: FM-Transmitter
es: Transmisores FM
fr: Émetteurs FM
it: Trasmettitori FM
ja: FMトランスミッター
nl: FM-zenders
no: FM-sendere
pl: Transmitery FM
pt: Transmissores FM
ru: FM-передатчики
sv: FM-sändare
tr: FM Vericiler

en: Channel Strips
xx: Channel Strips
cs: Kanálové pruhy mixážních pultů
da: Kanalfordelere
de: Channel Strips
es: Canales de grabación
fr: Tranches de console
it: Fascette canali
ja: チャンネルストリップ
nl: Kanaalstrips
no: Kanalstriper
pl: Tory sygnałowe
pt: Módulos de canais
ru: Канальные линейки
sv: Rackutrustning
tr: Kanal Şeritleri

en: Direct Boxes
xx: Direct Boxes
cs: DI-boxy
da: DI-bokse
de: DI-Boxen
es: Cajas directas
fr: Boîtes de direct
it: DI box
ja: ダイレクトボックス
nl: Direct boxen
no: Direktebokser
pl: DI-boksy
pt: Unidades DI
ru: Директ-боксы
sv: DI-boxar
tr: DI Kutuları

en: Headphones & Headsets
xx: Headphones & Headsets
cs: Sluchátka a náhlavní soupravy
da: Hovedtelefoner og headset
de: Kopfhörer & Headsets
es: Auriculares
fr: Casques Audio & Écouteurs, Casque audio
it: Cuffie e auricolari
ja: イヤホン・ヘッドセット
nl: Hoofdtelefoons en headsets
no: Hodetelefoner og hodesett
pl: Słuchawki i zestawy słuchawkowe
pt: Fones de ouvido e headsets
ru: Наушники и гарнитуры
sv: Hörlurar och headsets
tr: Kulaklıklar

en: Headphones
xx: Headphones
cs: Sluchátka
da: Hovedtelefoner, Høretelefoner
de: Kopfhörer
es: Auriculares de diadema
fi: Kuulokkeet
fr: Écouteurs
it: Cuffie
ja: イヤホン・ヘッドホン
nl: Hoofdtelefoons, Koptelefoon
no: Hodetelefoner
pl: Słuchawki
pt: Fones de ouvido
ru: Накладные наушники
sv: Hörlurar
tr: Mikrofonsuz Kulaklıklar

en: Circumaural headphones, Over-ear headphones, Full size headphones
da: Over-ear-hovedtelefoner
de: Over-Ear-Kopfhörer
fi: Over-ear kuulokkeet
fr: Écouteurs supra-auriculaires
nb: Over-ear-hodetelefoner
nl: Over-ear koptelefoon
sv: Over ear-hörlurar

en: Supra-aural headphones, On-ear headphones
da: On-ear-hovedtelefoner
de: On-Ear-Kopfhörer
fi: On-ear kuulokkeet
nb: On-ear-hodetelefoner
nl: On-ear koptelefoon
sv: On ear-hörlurar

en: Wireless headphones
da: Trådløse hovedtelefoner
de: Kabellose Kopfhörer
fi: Langattomat kuulokkeet
fr: Écouteurs sans fil
nb: Trådløse hodetelefoner
nl: Draadloze koptelefoon
sv: Trådlösa hörlurar

en: Wired headphones
da: Trådede hovedtelefoner
fr: Écouteurs avec fil
sv: Hörlurar med tråd

en: Noise-cancelling headphones
ar: سماعة إلغاء الضجيج
de: Geräuschreduzierender Kopfhörer
eo: Bruo-nuliga kapaŭskultilo
es: Auriculares con cancelación de ruido
fi: Vastamelukuuloke
ja: ノイズキャンセリングヘッドホン
mk: Шумозадушувачки слушалки
nl: Ruisonderdrukkende hoofdtelefoon
ru: Наушники с шумоподавлением
sv: Brusreducerande hörlurar
tr: Gürültü önleyici kulaklıklar
vi: Tai nghe khử tiếng ồn
zh: 抗噪耳機

en: Wireless circumaural headphones, Wireless over-ear headphones
da: Trådløse over-ear-hovedtelefoner
de: Kabellose Over-Ear-Kopfhörer
fi: Langattomat over-ear kuulokkeet
fr: Écouteurs supra-auriculaires sans fil
nb: Trådløse over-ear-hodetelefoner
nl: Draadloze over-ear koptelefoon
pl: Bezprzewodowe słuchawki nauszne
sv: Trådlösa over ear-hörlurar

en: Wireless supra-aural headphones, Wireless on-ear headphones
da: Trådløse on-ear-hovedtelefoner
de: Kabellose On-Ear-Kopfhörer
fi: Langattomat on-ear kuulokkeet
nb: Trådløse on-ear-hodetelefoner
nl: Draadloze on-ear koptelefoon
sv: Trådlösa on ear-hörlurar

en: Headsets
xx: Headsets
cs: Náhlavní soupravy
da: Headsets
de: Headsets
es: Auriculares con micrófono
fr: Casques, Casque
it: Auricolari
ja: ヘッドセット
nl: Headsets
no: Hodesett
pl: Zestawy słuchawkowe
pt: Headsets
ru: Головные гарнитуры
sv: Headset
tr: Mikrofonlu Kulaklıklar

en: Microphones
xx: Microphones
cs: Mikrofony
da: Mikrofoner
de: Mikrofone
es: Micrófonos
fr: Microphones
it: Microfoni
ja: マイク
nl: Microfoons
no: Mikrofoner
pl: Mikrofony
pt: Microfones
ru: Микрофоны
sv: Mikrofoner
tr: Mikrofonlar

en: Signal Processors
xx: Signal Processors
cs: Signálové procesory
da: Signalprocessorer
de: Signalprozessoren
es: Procesadores de señales
fr: Processeurs de signal
it: Processori di segnale
ja: シグナルプロセッサー
nl: Signaalprocessoren
no: Signalbehandlere
pl: Procesory sygnałowe
pt: Processadores de sinal
ru: Процессоры сигналов
sv: Signalprocessorer
tr: Sinyal İşlemcileri

en: Crossovers
xx: Crossovers
cs: Výhybky
da: Crossovers
de: Frequenzweichen
es: Filtros crossover
fr: Répartiteurs
it: Crossover
ja: クロスオーバー
nl: Cross-overs
no: Delefiltre
pl: Crossovery
pt: Crossovers
ru: Кроссоверы
sv: Delningsfilter
tr: Crossover'lar

en: Effects Processors
xx: Effects Processors
cs: Efektové procesory
da: Effektbehandlere
de: Effektprozessoren
es: Pedales de efectos
fr: Processeurs d'effets
it: Processori di effetti
ja: エフェクトプロセッサー
nl: Effectenprocessoren
no: Effektprosessorer
pl: Procesory efektów
pt: Processadores de efeito
ru: Эффект-процессоры
sv: Effektprocessorer
tr: Efekt İşlemcileri

en: Equalizers
xx: Equalizers
cs: Ekvalizéry
da: Equalizere
de: Equalizer
es: Ecualizadores
fr: Égaliseurs
it: Equalizzatori
ja: イコライザー
nl: Equalizers
no: Equalizere
pl: Equalizery
pt: Equalizadores
ru: Эквалайзеры
sv: Equalizer
tr: Ekolayzırlar

en: Loudspeaker Management Systems
xx: Loudspeaker Management Systems
cs: Ozvučovací systémy
da: PA-styringssystemer
de: Steuerungssysteme für PA-Anlagen
es: Sistemas de gestión de megafonía
fr: Systèmes de gestion de la sonorisation
it: Sistemi di gestione amplificatori
ja: PA管理システム
nl: Omroepsystemen
no: Styringssystemer for høyttalere
pl: Systemy do zarządzania PA
pt: Sistemas de gerenciamento de comunicação sonora
ru: Системы управления громкой связью
sv: System för hantering av PA-anläggningar
tr: Anons Yönetim Sistemleri